Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 13 Licensing of Mortgage Lenders and Mortgage Brokers

Cross references.

Real estate brokers’ license requirement, §

44-3-190

.

Law reviews.

For note on 1993 enactment of this article, see 10 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 11 (1993).

For note on the 1994 amendments of Code Sections 7-1-1000 to 7-1-1006, 7-1-1008, 7-1-1010 to 7-1-1011, 7-1-1014, 7-1-1016 to 7-1-1018 and enactment of Code Section 7-1-1021 of this article, see 11 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1994).

For comment, “Regulation X:
A New Direction for the Regulation of Mortgage Servicers,” see 63 Emory L. J. 175 (2013).

For comment, “Amidst the Walking Dead:
Judicial and Nonjudicial Approaches for Eradicating Zombie Mortgages,” see 65 Emory L.J. 795 (2016).

7-1-1000.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Affiliate” or “person affiliated with” means, when used with reference to a specified person, a person who directly, indirectly, or through one or more intermediaries controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the person specified. Any beneficial owner of 10 percent or more of the securities of a person or any executive officer, director, trustee, joint venturer, or general partner of a person is an affiliate of such person unless the shareholder, executive officer, director, trustee, joint venturer, or general partner shall prove that he or she in fact does not control, is not controlled by, or is not under common control with such person.

“Audited financial statement” means the product of the examination of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards by an independent certified public accountant, which product consists of an opinion on the financial statements indicating their conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of banking and finance.

“Commitment” or “commitment agreement” means a statement by a lender required to be licensed or registered under this article that sets forth the terms and conditions upon which the lender is willing to make a particular mortgage loan to a particular borrower.

“Control,” including “controlling,” “controlled by,” and “under common control with,”’ means the direct or indirect possession of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting or nonvoting securities, by contract, or otherwise.

(5.1)

“Covered employee” means any employee of a mortgage lender or mortgage broker who is involved in residential mortgage loan related activities for property located in Georgia and includes, but is not limited to, a mortgage loan originator, processor, or underwriter, or other employee who has access to residential mortgage loan origination, processing, or underwriting information.”

“Department” means the Department of Banking and Finance.

“Depository institution” has the same meaning as in Section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. Section 1813(c), and includes any credit union.

“Dwelling” means a residential structure that contains one to four units, whether or not that structure is attached to real property pursuant to Regulation Z Section 226.2(a)(19). The term includes an individual condominium unit, cooperative unit, mobile home, and trailer if it is used as a residence.

“Executive officer” means the chief executive officer, the president, the principal financial officer, the principal operating officer, each vice president with responsibility involving policy-making functions for a significant aspect of a person’s business, the secretary, the treasurer, or any other person performing similar managerial or supervisory functions with respect to any organization whether incorporated or unincorporated.

“Extortionate means” means the use or the threat of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation of the person, or property of the person.

“Federal banking agencies” means the Comptroller of the Currency, the National Credit Union Administration, and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Such term shall also include the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.

“Georgia Residential Mortgage Act” means this article, which also includes certain provisions in order to implement the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008.

“Individual” means a natural person.

“License” means a license issued by the department under this article to act as a mortgage loan originator, mortgage lender, or mortgage broker.

“Loan processor or underwriter” means an individual who performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to the supervision and instruction of a person licensed or exempt from licensing. For purposes of this paragraph, “clerical or support duties” may include, subsequent to the receipt of an application, the receipt, collection, distribution, and analysis of information common for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan; and communicating with a consumer to obtain the information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a loan, to the extent that such communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms. An individual engaging solely in loan processor or underwriter activities shall not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information, including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that such individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator.

“Lock-in agreement” means a written agreement whereby a lender or a broker required to be licensed or registered under this article guarantees for a specified number of days or until a specified date the availability of a specified rate of interest for a mortgage loan, a specified formula by which the rate of interest will be determined, or a specific number of discount points if the mortgage loan is approved and closed within the stated period of time.

“Makes a mortgage loan” means to advance funds, offer to advance funds, or make a commitment to advance funds to an applicant for a mortgage loan.

“Misrepresent”’ means to make a false statement of a substantive fact. Misrepresent may also mean to intentionally engage in any conduct which leads to a false belief which is material to the transaction.

“Mortgage broker” means any person who directly or indirectly solicits, processes, places, or negotiates mortgage loans for others; offers to solicit, process, place, or negotiate mortgage loans for others; or closes mortgage loans which may be in the mortgage broker’s own name with funds provided by others, and which loans are assigned to the mortgage lenders providing the funding of such loans within 24 hours of the funding.

The term does not include a retailer or retail broker of a manufactured or mobile home as defined in Code Section 8-2-131 or a residential industrialized building as defined in Code Section 8-2-111:

Whose residential mortgage loan activities are limited to compiling and transmitting residential mortgage loan applications along with related supporting documentation to mortgage lenders who are licensed or exempt from the licensing provisions of this article or communicating with residential mortgage loan applicants as necessary to obtain additional documents that complete the residential mortgage loan application to those licensed or exempt mortgage lenders; and

Who does not receive any payment or fee from any person for assisting the applicant to apply for or obtain financing to purchase the manufactured home, mobile home, or residential industrialized building.

The term does not include an employee of a retailer or retail broker of a manufactured or mobile home as defined in Code Section 8-2-131 or a residential industrialized building as defined in Code Section 8-2-111 who:

Satisfies the requirements set forth in paragraph (B) of this paragraph;

Is acting within the scope of employment and under the supervision of the retailer or retail broker as an employee and not as an independent contractor;

Is employed by only one such retailer or retail broker and shall be at all times eligible for employment in compliance with the provisions and prohibitions of Code Section 7-1-1004;

Has not been issued a cease and desist order in the past five years if such order was based on a violation of Code Section 7-1-1002 or 7-1-1013; and

Has not had a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage loan originator license revoked within the past five years.

“Mortgage lender” means any person who directly or indirectly makes, originates, underwrites, holds, or purchases mortgage loans or who services mortgage loans.

“Mortgage loan” means a loan or agreement to extend credit made to a natural person, which loan is secured by a deed to secure debt, security deed, mortgage, security instrument, deed of trust, or other document representing a security interest or lien upon any interest in one-to-four family residential property located in Georgia, regardless of where made, including the renewal or refinancing of any such loan.

“Mortgage loan originator” means an individual who for compensation or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain takes a residential mortgage loan application or offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan. Generally, this does not include an individual engaged solely as a loan processor or underwriter except as otherwise provided in subsection (a.1) of Code Section 7-1-1002; a person or entity that only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or registered in accordance with Georgia law unless the person or entity is compensated by a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator; and does not include a person or entity solely involved in extensions of credit relating to time-share plans, as that term is defined in 11 U.S.C. Section 101(53D).

“Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” means a mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of licensed mortgage loan originators, mortgage loan brokers, and mortgage loan lenders, or its successor.

“Nontraditional mortgage product” means any mortgage product other than a 30 year fixed rate mortgage.

“Person” means any individual, sole proprietorship, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, trust, or any other group of individuals, however organized.

“Real estate brokerage activity” means any activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage services to the public, including acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee of real property; bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property; negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property, other than in connection with providing financing with respect to any such transaction; engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate agent or real estate broker under any applicable law; and offering to engage in any activity or act in any capacity described herein.

“Registered mortgage loan originator” means any individual who meets the definition of mortgage loan originator, is registered with and maintains a unique identifier through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, and is an employee of:

A depository institution;

A subsidiary that is:

Owned and controlled by a depository institution; and

Regulated by a federal banking agency; or

An institution regulated by the Farm Credit Administration.

“Registrant” means any person required to register pursuant to Code Sections 7-1-1001 and 7-1-1003.2.

“Residential property” means improved real property used or occupied, or intended to be used or occupied, as the primary residence of a natural person. Such term does not include rental property or second homes. A natural person can have only one primary residence.

“Residential mortgage loan” means any loan primarily for personal, family, or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling, as defined in 15 U.S.C. Section 1602 of the Truth in Lending Act, or residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling.

“Residential real estate” means any real property located in Georgia upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling.

“Service a mortgage loan” means the collection or remittance or the right to collect or remit payments of principal, interest, trust items such as insurance and taxes, and any other payments pursuant to a mortgage loan.

“Ultimate equitable owner” means a natural person who, directly or indirectly, owns or controls an ownership interest in a corporation or any other form of business organization, regardless of whether such natural person owns or controls such ownership interest through one or more natural persons or one or more proxies, powers of attorney, nominees, corporations, associations, limited liability companies, partnerships, trusts, joint-stock companies, other entities or devices, or any combination thereof.

“Unique identifier” means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1000

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 570, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 13; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, §§ 29, 30; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 22; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 29/SB 82; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1030, § 13/SB 55; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 6/HB 239; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 6-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 24/HB 780; Ga. L. 2019, p. 89, § 1/HB 212; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 31/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429; Ga. L. 2022, p. 403, § 1/SB 470.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, in paragraph (32), deleted “for another” following “remittance” and deleted “for another of” following “remit”. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2019 amendments.

The first 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, designated the existing provisions of paragraph (19) as subparagraph (19)(A); in subparagraph (19)(A), substituted “others; offers to solicit, process, place, or negotiate mortgage loans for others; or” for “others, or offers to solicit, process, place, or negotiate mortgage loans for others or who” near the middle, inserted a comma following “provided by others” in the middle, deleted “within 24 hours of the funding of the loans” following “loans are assigned” near the end, and added “within 24 hours of the funding” at the end; and added subparagraphs (19)(B) and (19)(C). The second 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, substituted “15 U.S.C. Section 1602” for “Section 103(v)” in paragraph (30).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in paragraphs (23), (27), and (34).

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, added paragraph (5.1).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, “attorney” was substituted for “attorneys” in paragraph (12) (now paragraph (33)).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

Law reviews.

For note, “State-Imposed Interest Rate Ceilings and Home Equity Loan Scandal in Georgia,” see 11 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 591 (1995).

For survey article on real property law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 345 (2008).

7-1-1001.
Exemption for certain persons and entities; registration requirements; authorized actions of licensed mortgage lenders; violations.

The following persons shall not be required to obtain a mortgage loan originator, mortgage broker, or mortgage lender license and shall not be subject to the provisions of this article but may be subject to registration requirements, if registration of such persons is required by this article:

Any lender authorized to engage in business as a bank, credit card bank, savings institution, or credit union under the laws of the United States, any state or territory of the United States, or the District of Columbia, the deposits of which are federally insured;

Any wholly owned subsidiary of any lender described in paragraph (1) of this subsection. Any subsidiary that violates any applicable law of this article may be subject to a cease and desist order as provided for in Code Section 7-1-1018;

(2.1)

Any wholly owned subsidiary of any bank holding company; provided, however, that such subsidiary shall be subject to registration requirements in order to facilitate the department’s handling of consumer inquiries. Such requirements are contained in Code Section 7-1-1003.3;

Registered mortgage loan originators, when acting for an entity described in paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection. To qualify for this exemption, an individual shall be registered with and maintain a unique identifier through registration with the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry;

Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan with or on behalf of an immediate family member of such individual. For purposes of this exemption, the term “immediate family member” means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent, or grandchild. Immediate family members shall include stepparents, stepchildren, stepsiblings, and adoptive relationships;

An attorney licensed to practice law in Georgia who negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan on behalf of a client as an ancillary matter to the attorney’s representation of the client, unless the attorney is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator;

A Georgia licensed real estate broker or real estate salesperson not actively engaged in the business of negotiating mortgage loans or a Georgia licensed real estate salesperson providing information to a lender or its agent related to an existing or potential short sale transaction in which a separate fee is not received by such real estate broker or real estate salesperson; provided, however, that such real estate broker or real estate salesperson who directly or indirectly negotiates, places, or finds a mortgage for others shall not be exempt from the provisions of this article;

Any person performing any act relating to mortgage loans under order of any court;

Any natural person or the estate of or trust created by a natural person making a mortgage loan with his or her own funds for his or her own investment, including those natural persons or the estates of or trusts created by such natural persons who make a purchase money mortgage for financing sales of their own property;

Any agency, division, or instrumentality of the federal government of the United States of America; the government of the State of Georgia; the government of any other state of the United States; or any county or municipal government of the State of Georgia. This includes, but is not limited to, the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority, the Georgia Development Authority, the Federal National Mortgage Association (FNMA), the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation (FHLMC), the Government National Mortgage Association (GNMA), the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD), the Federal Housing Administration (FHA), the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA), the Farmers Home Administration (FmHA), and the Farm Credit Administration and its chartered agricultural credit associations;

Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan secured by a dwelling that serves as the individual’s residence;

Any person who makes a mortgage loan to an employee of such person as an employment benefit;

Any licensee under Chapter 3 of this title, the “Georgia Installment Loan Act,” provided that any mortgage loan made by such licensee is for $3,000.00 or less;

Nonprofit corporations making mortgage loans to promote home ownership or improvements for the disadvantaged;

A natural person employed by a licensed or registered mortgage broker, a licensed or registered mortgage lender, or any person exempted from the mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensing requirements of this article when acting within the scope of employment and under the supervision of the mortgage broker or mortgage lender or exempted person as an employee and not as an independent contractor, except those natural persons exempt from licensure as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender under paragraph (17) of this subsection. To be exempt from licensure as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender, a natural person shall be employed by only one such employer and shall be at all times eligible for employment in compliance with the provisions and prohibitions of Code Section 7-1-1004. Such natural person, who meets the definition of mortgage loan originator provided in paragraph (22) of Code Section 7-1-1000, shall be subject to mortgage loan originator licensing requirements. A natural person against whom a cease and desist order has become final shall not qualify for this exemption while under the employment time restrictions of subsection (o) of Code Section 7-1-1004 if such order was based on a violation of Code Section 7-1-1002 or 7-1-1013 or whose license was revoked within five years of the date such person was hired;

Any person who purchases mortgage loans from a mortgage broker or mortgage lender solely as an investment and who is not in the business of brokering, making, purchasing, or servicing mortgage loans;

Any natural person who makes five or fewer mortgage loans in any one calendar year. A person other than a natural person who makes five or fewer mortgage loans in any one calendar year shall not be exempt from the licensing requirements of this article;

A natural person who is under an exclusive written independent contractor agreement with any person that is a licensed mortgage broker, so long as such licensed mortgage broker also meets the following requirements, subject to the review and approval of the department:

The licensee continuously provides a surety bond as required by Code Section 7-1-1003.2 in the amount of $150,000.00 plus $50,000.00 per exempt natural person, not to exceed a maximum of $2 million to cover its activities as well as the activities of all of its natural persons exempted by this paragraph;

The licensee has applied for and been granted a mortgage broker license, consistent with the provisions of this article and renewable annually;

The licensee has paid applicable fees for this license, which license fees shall be the sum of the cost of the individual mortgage broker license fees if each exempt natural person received a mortgage broker license;

The licensee has full and direct financial responsibility for the mortgage activities of such natural person and full and direct responsibility for the proper education of such natural person, the handling of consumer complaints related to such natural person, and the supervision of the mortgage activities of such natural person. The licensee shall supervise such natural person on an ongoing and regular basis and shall be accountable for the mortgage activities of such natural person;

The licensee or the parent company if the licensee is a wholly owned subsidiary:

Files reports under Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934;

Has a market capitalization in excess of $4 billion at the time of the initial application for a mortgage broker license based on the number of outstanding shares at the end of the quarter as disclosed in the most recent Form 10-Q filed with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission; and

Has equity securities that are listed on the New York Stock Exchange, the National Association of Securities Dealers Automated Quotations, or other stock market approved by the department in writing;

At the time of the initial application for a mortgage broker license, the licensee has never had a mortgage lender license or mortgage broker license revoked or suspended in Georgia or any other state;

The licensee, the parent company if the licensee is a wholly owned subsidiary, or an affiliate of the licensee if both the affiliate and licensee are wholly owned subsidiaries of the same parent company, is licensed by the office of the Commissioner of Insurance as an insurance company or is registered with the Secretary of State as a broker-dealer;

The licensee is licensed as a mortgage lender or mortgage broker in ten or more states; and

At the time of the initial application for a mortgage broker license, the licensee has received at least a satisfactory evaluation in the most recent examination conducted by the majority of the states in which it has a mortgage broker or mortgage lender license and has adequately addressed with the department any unsatisfactory evaluations in the most recent examination conducted by any state in which it has a mortgage broker or mortgage lender license.

To maintain the exemption, a natural person shall:

Solicit, process, place, or negotiate a mortgage loan to be brokered only by the licensee;

Be at all times in compliance with this article, including the provisions and prohibitions of Code Section 7-1-1013, the provisions and prohibitions applicable to employees under Code Section 7-1-1004, and the department’s rules and regulations;

Be licensed as a mortgage loan originator in Georgia and work exclusively for the licensee, the parent company if the licensee is a wholly owned subsidiary, or an affiliate of the licensee if both the affiliate and licensee are wholly owned subsidiaries of the same parent company; and

Be licensed as an insurance agent with the office of the Commissioner of Insurance or registered as a broker-dealer agent with the Secretary of State on behalf of the licensee, the parent company of the licensee if the licensee is a wholly owned subsidiary of the parent company, or an affiliate of the licensee if both the affiliate and licensee are wholly owned subsidiaries of the same parent company.

An employee of a bona fide nonprofit corporation who acts as a mortgage loan originator only with respect to his or her work duties with the bona fide nonprofit corporation and who acts as a mortgage loan originator only with respect to mortgage loans with terms that are favorable to the borrower shall be exempt from obtaining a mortgage loan originator license. In order for a corporation to be considered a bona fide nonprofit corporation under this paragraph, the department shall determine, under criteria and pursuant to processes established by the department, that the nonprofit corporation:

Has the status of a tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

Promotes affordable housing;

Conducts its activities in a manner that serves public or charitable purposes, rather than commercial purposes;

Receives funding and revenue and charges fees in a manner that does not incentivize it or its employees to act other than in the best interests of its clients;

Compensates its employees in a manner that does not incentivize employees to act other than in the best interests of its clients;

Provides or identifies for the borrower mortgage loans with terms favorable to the borrower and comparable to mortgage loans and housing assistance provided under government housing assistance programs. In order for mortgage loans to have terms that are favorable to the borrower, the department shall determine that the terms are consistent with loan origination in a public or charitable context, rather than in a commercial context; and

Satisfies the exemption from licensure set forth in paragraph (13) of this subsection.

The department shall periodically examine the books and activities of an organization it has previously identified as a bona fide nonprofit corporation for purposes of this paragraph in order to determine if it continues to meet the criteria for such status under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. In conducting such an examination, the department shall have all of the powers set forth in Code Section 7-1-1009. In the event the nonprofit corporation no longer qualifies for such status, then the employee exemption from having a mortgage loan originator license shall no longer be applicable; or

Any person who purchases or holds closed mortgage loans for the sole purpose of securitization into a secondary market, provided that such person holds the individual loans for less than seven days.

Exemptions enumerated in paragraphs (1), (2), (2.1), (7), (8), (9), (11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), and (17) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be exemptions from licensure as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender only. Nothing in paragraphs (1), (2), (2.1), (7), (8), (9), (11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), and (17) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be intended to exempt natural persons from compliance with mortgage loan originator licensing requirements as set forth in this article and the Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008. Individuals that transact business as a mortgage loan originator, unless specifically exempted by paragraph (3), (4), (5), (6), (10), or (18) of subsection (a) of this Code section, shall obtain a mortgage loan originator license as required by Code Section 7-1-1002 whether they are employed by a mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or person exempted as a mortgage broker or lender as set forth in this subsection.

A licensed mortgage lender is authorized to engage in all activities that are authorized for a mortgage broker and, as a result, shall not be required to obtain a mortgage broker license.

Any violation of this article or the rules and regulations of the department by a natural person exempted pursuant to paragraph (17) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be deemed to be a violation by both the licensee and the exempt natural person for purposes of the enforcement provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1001

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 570, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 14; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 31; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 30; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 23; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 16; Ga. L. 2006, p. 750, § 1/SB 505; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 33/SB 70; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 7/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 7/HB 239; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 7/HB 142; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 7/HB 942; Ga. L. 2013, p. 638, § 1/HB 83; Ga. L. 2014, p. 421, § 1/HB 750; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, §§ 6-1, 7-4/HB 811; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 32/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 9/SB 462; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 36/HB 111; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 35/HB 891; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 7/HB 1428.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “if registration of such persons is required” for “unless otherwise provided” near the end of subsection (a); and added subsection (c).

The first 2020 amendment, effective June 30, 2020, substituted “Georgia Installment Loan Act” for “Georgia Industrial Loan Act” in paragraph (a)(12). The second 2020 amendment, effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in the second sentence of paragraph (a)(3).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “Any agency, division, or instrumentality of: the federal government of the United States of America; the government of the State of Georgia; the government of any other state of the United States; or any county or municipal of the State of Georgia. This includes, but is not limited to,” for “The United States of America, the State of Georgia or any other state, and any agency, division, or corporate instrumentality of any governmental entity, including without limitation:” at the beginning of paragraph (a)(9).

The 2022 amendments.

The first 2022 amendment, effective July 1, 2022, substituted “salesperson; provided, however, that” for “salesperson; however,” in paragraph (a)(6), rewrote paragraph (a)(17), substituted “; or” for a period at the end of subparagraph (a)(18)(B), added paragraph (a)(19); and added subsection (d). The second 2022 amendment, effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “instrumentality of the” for “instrumentality of: the” in paragraph (a)(9).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, a semicolon was substituted for a period at the end of paragraph (6) of subsection (a) (now paragraph (a)(8)).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “Code section” was substituted for “subsection” in the first sentence in paragraph (2) (now paragraph (a)(2)).

Law reviews.

For annual survey on real property, see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 233 (2013).

7-1-1001.1.
Requirement for mortgage loan originator license; application to sellers of mobile homes.

It shall be prohibited for any person to engage in the activities of a mortgage loan originator without first obtaining and maintaining a mortgage loan originator license as set forth in this article.

The department shall have the broad administrative authority to administer, interpret, and enforce this article and the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008, and promulgate rules or regulations implementing it, in order to carry out the intentions of the federal legislation. Such administrative authority of the department shall include, but shall not be limited to, the authority to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of such federal legislation related to the temporary authority of mortgage loan originators.

The provisions of the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008 shall apply to the activities of retail sellers of manufactured homes to the extent determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development through written guidelines, rules, regulations, or interpretive letters.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1001.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 8/HB 239; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 33/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in subsection (a), substituted “It” for “Effective August 1, 2010, it” at the beginning of the first sentence and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “All provisions within this article that relate to the licensing requirements and associated duties and responsibilities of mortgage loan originators shall be effective as of August 1, 2010.”; and added the second sentence in subsection (b).